Maine, session 132, LD1241.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10253, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by c. 614, §9, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §10253, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Make Change for Wildlife program. The Make Change for Wildlife program is
established to encourage voluntary support for the fund from businesses that collect
voluntary customer contributions at the point of sale. Businesses shall deposit
contributions collected under this subsection with the Treasurer of State and designate
those contributions for deposit in the fund. The Treasurer of State shall credit all
contributions to the fund and all money generated pursuant to this subsection must be used
only for the purposes described in subsection 1.
Sec. 3. Report. The Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife shall submit a report
regarding the Make Change for Wildlife program, established in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 12, section 10253, subsection 6, including any suggested legislation, to the
Joint Standing Committee on Inland Fisheries and Wildlife no later than January 1, 2026.
The committee may report out a bill based on the report to the Second Regular Session of
the 132nd Legislature.
Page 1 - 132LR1991(03)